California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
 lies from any court order under this section denying a claim of exemption or modifying or terminating an earnings withholding order. An appeal by the judgment creditor from an order modifying or terminating the earnings withholding order does not stay the order from which the appeal is taken. Notwithstanding the appeal, until the order modifying or terminating the earnings withholding order is set aside or modified, the order allowing the claim of exemption in whole or in part shall be given the same effect as if the appeal had not been taken.

(k) This section does not apply to a withholding order for support or a withholding order for taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 708, Sec. 8.   (AB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

706.106.

No findings are required in court proceedings under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

706.108.

(a) If a writ of execution has been issued to the county where the judgment debtor’s employer is to be served and the time specified in subdivision (b) of Section 699.530 for levy on property under the writ has not expired, a judgment creditor may deliver an application for issuance of an earnings withholding order to a registered process server who may then issue an earnings withholding order.

(b) If the registered process server has issued the earnings withholding order, the registered process server, before serving the earnings withholding order, shall cause to be deposited with the levying officer a copy of the writ of execution, the application for issuance of an earnings withholding order, a copy of the earnings withholding order, and the fee, as provided by Section 26750 of the Government Code.

(c) A registered process server may serve an earnings withholding order on an employer whether the earnings withholding order was issued by a levying officer or by a registered process server, but no earnings withholding order may be served after the time specified in subdivision (b) of Section 699.530. In performing this function, the registered process server shall serve upon the designated employer all of the following:

(1) The original and one copy of the earnings withholding order.

(2) The form for the employer’s return.

(3) The notice to the employee of the earnings withholding order.

(4) A copy of the form that the judgment debtor may use to make a claim of exemption.

(5) A copy of the form the judgment debtor may use to provide a financial statement.

(6) A copy of the employer’s instructions referred to in Section 706.127, except as otherwise prescribed in rules adopted by the Judicial Council.

(d) Within five court days after service under this section, all of the following shall be filed with the levying officer:

(1) The writ of execution, if it is not already in the hands of the levying officer.

(2) Proof of service on the employer of the papers listed in subdivision (c).

(3) Instructions in writing, as required by the provisions of Section 687.010.

(e) If the fee provided by Section 26750 of the Government Code has been paid, the levying officer shall perform all other duties required by this chapter as if the levying officer had served the earnings withholding order. If the registered process server does not comply with subdivisions (b), where applicable, and (d), the service of the earnings withholding order is ineffective and the levying officer shall not be required to perform any duties under the order, and may terminate the order and release any withheld
 earnings to the judgment debtor.

(f) The fee for services of a registered process server under this section is a recoverable cost pursuant to Section 1033.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 102, Sec. 3.   (AB 2211)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

706.109.

An earnings withholding order may not be issued against the earnings of the spouse of the judgment debtor except by court order upon noticed motion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1671, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Forms; Employer’s Instructions [706.120. - 706.129.]

706.120.

Except as provided in Section 706.081, the Judicial Council shall prescribe the form of the applications, notices, claims of exemption, orders, and other documents required by this chapter as provided in Section 681.030, and only such forms may be used to implement this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

706.121.

The “application for issuance of earnings withholding order” shall be executed under oath and shall include all of the following:

(a) The name, the last known address, and, if known, the social security number of the judgment debtor.

(b) The name and address of the
 judgment creditor.

(c) The court where the judgment was entered and the date the judgment was entered.

(d) Whether the judgment is based in whole or in part on a claim for elder or dependent adult financial abuse and, if in part, how much of the judgment arises from that claim.

(e) The date of issuance of a writ of execution to the county where the earnings withholding order is sought.

(f) The total amount required to satisfy the order on the date of issuance (which may not exceed the amount required to satisfy the writ of execution on the date of issuance of the order plus the levying officer’s statutory fee for service of the order).

(g) The name and address of the employer to whom the
 order will be directed.

(h) The name and address of the person to whom the withheld money is to be paid by the levying officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 64, Sec. 3.   (AB 2619)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

706.122.

The “notice to employee of earnings withholding order” shall contain a statement that informs the employee in simple terms of the nature of a wage garnishment, the right to an exemption, the procedure for claiming an exemption, and any other information the Judicial Council determines would be useful to the employee and appropriate for inclusion in the notice, including all of the following:

(a) The named employer has been ordered to withhold from the earnings of the judgment debtor the amounts required to be withheld under Section 706.050, or such other amounts as are specified in the earnings withholding order, and to pay these amounts over to the levying officer for transmittal to the person specified in the order in payment of the judgment described in the order.

(b) The manner of computing the amounts required to be withheld pursuant to Section 706.050.

(c) The judgment debtor may be able to keep more or all of the judgment debtor’s earnings if the judgment debtor proves that the additional earnings are necessary for the support of the judgment debtor or the judgment debtor’s family supported in whole or in part by the judgment debtor.

(d) If the judgment debtor wishes a court hearing to prove that amounts should not be withheld from the judgment debtor’s earnings because they are necessary for the support of the judgment debtor or the judgment debtor’s family supported in whole or in part by the judgment debtor, the judgment debtor shall file with the levying officer an original and one copy of the “judgment debtor’s claim of exemption” and an original and one copy of the “judgment debtor’s financial statement.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 64, Sec. 8.   (SB 233)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

706.123.

The “judgment debtor’s claim of exemption” shall be executed under oath. The claim of exemption shall indicate how much the judgment debtor believes should be withheld from the judgment debtor’s earnings each pay period by the employer pursuant to the earnings withholding order and shall state the judgment debtor’s present mailing address.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

706.124.

The “judgment debtor’s financial statement” shall be executed as provided in Section 703.530 and contain all of the information required by that section and the following additional information:

(a) Whether any earnings withholding orders are in effect with respect to the earnings of the judgment debtor or the spouse or dependents of the judgment debtor.

(b) Whether any earnings assignment orders for support are in effect with
 respect to the earnings of the judgment debtor or the spouse or dependents of the judgment debtor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 163, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 161 of Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------

706.125.

The “earnings withholding order” shall include all of the following:

(a) The name, address, and, if known, the social security number of the judgment debtor.

(b) The name and address of the employer to whom the order is directed.

(c) The court where the judgment was entered, the date the judgment was entered, and the name of the judgment creditor.

(d) Whether the judgment is based in whole or in part on a claim for elder or dependent adult financial abuse and, if in part, how much of the judgment arises from the claim.

(e) The date of issuance of the writ of execution to the county where the earnings withholding order is sought.

(f) The total amount required to satisfy the order on the date of issuance (which may not exceed the amount required to satisfy the writ of execution on the date of issuance of the order plus the levying officer’s statutory fee for service of the order).

(g) A description of the withholding
 period and an order to the employer to withhold from the earnings of the judgment debtor for each pay period the amount required to be withheld under Section 706.050 or the amount specified in the order subject to Section 706.024, as the case may be, for the pay periods ending during the withholding period.

(h) An order to the employer to pay over to the levying officer at a specified address the amount required to be withheld and paid over pursuant to the order in the manner and within the times provided by law.

(i) An order that the employer fill out the “employer’s return” and return it by first-class mail, postage prepaid, to the levying officer at a specified address within 15 days after service of the earnings withholding order.

(j) An order that the employer deliver to the judgment debtor a copy of the
 earnings withholding order and the “notice to employee of earnings withholding order” within 10 days after service of the earnings withholding order; but, if the judgment debtor is no longer employed by the employer and the employer does not owe the employee any earnings, the employer is not required to make the delivery.

(k) The name and address of the levying officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 64, Sec. 4.   (AB 2619)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

706.126.

(a) The “employer’s return” shall be executed under oath. The form for the return provided to the employer shall state all of the following information:

(1) The name and address of the levying officer to whom the form is to be returned.

(2) A direction that the form be mailed to the levying officer by first-class mail, postage prepaid, no later than 15 days after the date of service of the earnings withholding order.

(3) The name, the address, and, if known, the social security number of the judgment debtor.

(b) In addition, the employer’s return form shall require the
 employer to supply all of the following information:

(1) The date the earnings withholding order was served on the employer.

(2) Whether the judgment debtor is employed by the employer or whether the employer otherwise owes earnings to the employee.

(3) If the judgment debtor is employed by the employer or the employer otherwise owes earnings to the employee, the amount of the employee’s earnings for the last pay period and the length of this pay period.

(4) Whether the employer was required on the date of service to comply with an earlier earnings withholding order and, if so, the name of the judgment creditor who secured the earlier order, the levying officer who served such order, the date it was issued, the date it was served, the expiration date of
 such order, and which of the earnings withholding orders the employer is required to comply with under the applicable statutory rules concerning the priority of such orders.

(5) Whether the employer was required on the date of service to comply with an earnings assignment order for support and, if so, the court which issued such assignment order and the date it was issued and any other information the Judicial Council determines is needed to identify the order.

(6) The name and address of the person to whom notices to the employer are to be sent.

(7) The date on which the employer provided the employee a copy of the earnings withholding order and the notice of earnings withholding order, the name and title of the person who provided the order and notice, and a short description of the manner in which the order and
 notice were provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 708, Sec. 9.   (AB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

706.127.

(a) The Judicial Council shall prepare “employer’s instructions” for employers and revise or supplement these instructions to reflect changes in the law or rules regulating the withholding of earnings.

(b) Except to the extent that they are included in the forms required to be provided by the employer to the levying officer, the Judicial Council shall publish and provide to the levying officers copies of the employer’s instructions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

706.128.

The “judgment creditor’s notice of opposition to the claim of exemption” shall be executed under oath and shall include all of the following:

(a) The name, last known address, and, if known, the social security number of the judgment debtor.

(b) The name and address of the judgment creditor.

(c) The date of mailing of the notice of claim of exemption.

(d) The amount of the judgment debtor’s
 claim of exemption which the judgment creditor claims is not exempt.

(e) The factual and legal grounds for the judgment creditor’s opposition to the claim of exemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

706.129.

The levying officer shall have copies of the forms for the “judgment debtor’s claim of exemption” and “judgment debtor’s financial statement” available at the levying officer’s office for distribution without charge to a person who desires to make a claim of exemption under Section 706.051.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Administration and Enforcement [706.151. - 706.154.]

706.151.

The Judicial Council may perform all acts required by the Administrator of the Wage and Hour Division of the United States Department of Labor as conditions to exemption of this state from the earnings garnishment provisions of the Consumer Credit Protection Act of 1968 (15 U.S.C. Secs. 1671–1677), including, but not limited to:

(a) Representing and acting on behalf of the state in relation to the Administrator of the Wage and Hour Division and the administrator’s representatives with regard to any matter relating to, or arising out of, the application, interpretation, and enforcement
 of the laws of this state regulating withholding of earnings.

(b) Submitting to the Administrator of the Wage and Hour Division in duplicate and on a current basis, a certified copy of every statute of this state affecting earnings withholding, and a certified copy of any decision in any case involving any of those statutes, made by the Supreme Court of this state.

(c) Submitting to the Administrator of the Wage and Hour Division any information relating to the enforcement of earnings withholding laws of this state which the administrator may request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

706.152.

If an employer withholds earnings pursuant to this chapter and, with the intent to defraud either the judgment creditor or the judgment debtor, fails to pay such withheld earnings over to the levying officer, the employer is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

706.153.

(a) No employer shall defer or accelerate any payment of earnings to an employee with the intent to defeat or diminish the judgment creditor’s rights under an earnings withholding order issued pursuant to the procedures provided by this chapter.

(b) If an employer violates this section, the judgment creditor may bring a civil action against the employer to recover the amount that would have been withheld and paid over pursuant to this chapter had the employer not violated this section. The remedy provided by this subdivision is not exclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

706.154.

(a) If an employer fails to withhold or to pay over the amount the employer is required to withhold and pay over pursuant to this chapter, the judgment creditor may bring a civil action against the employer to recover such amount. The remedy provided by this subdivision is not exclusive.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an employer who complies with any written order or written notice which purports to be given or served in accordance with the provisions of this chapter is not subject to any civil or criminal liability for such compliance unless the employer
 has actively participated in a fraud.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Miscellaneous Creditors’ Remedies [708.010. - 709.030.]



  ARTICLE 1. Written Interrogatories to Judgment Debtor [708.010. - 708.030.]

708.010.

(a) Except as provided in this section and in subdivision (b) of Section 708.020, the procedure in this article may be used at any time a money judgment is enforceable.

(b) If enforcement of the judgment is stayed on appeal by the giving of a sufficient undertaking under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 916) of Title 13, all proceedings under this article are stayed. In any other case where the enforcement of the judgment is stayed, all proceedings under this article are stayed unless the court otherwise expressly orders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

708.020.

(a) The judgment creditor may propound written interrogatories to the judgment debtor, in the manner provided in Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 2030.010) of Title 4 of Part 4, requesting information to aid in enforcement of the money judgment. The judgment debtor shall answer the interrogatories in the manner and within the time provided by Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 2030.010) of Title 4 of Part 4.

(b) The judgment creditor may
 not serve interrogatories pursuant to this section within 120 days after the judgment debtor has responded to interrogatories previously served pursuant to this section or within 120 days after the judgment debtor has been examined pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 708.110), and the judgment debtor is not required to respond to any interrogatories so served.

(c) Interrogatories served pursuant to this section may be enforced, to the extent practicable, in the same manner as interrogatories in a civil action.

(d) The limitation provided by Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 2030.010) of Title 4 of Part 4 on the number of interrogatories that may be propounded applies to each set of interrogatories propounded from time to time pursuant to this section, but does not apply cumulatively to interrogatories propounded by the judgment creditor to the judgment
 debtor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 182, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 64 of Ch. 182.)
-------------------------------------------

708.030.

(a) The judgment creditor may demand that any judgment debtor produce and permit the party making the demand, or someone acting on that party’s behalf, to inspect and to copy a document that is in the possession, custody, or control of the party on whom the demand is made in the manner provided in Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 2031.010) of Title 4 of Part 4, if the demand requests information to aid in enforcement of the money judgment. The judgment debtor shall respond and comply with the demand in
 the manner and within the time provided by Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 2031.010) of Title 4 of Part 4.

(b) The judgment creditor may not serve interrogatories or inspection demands pursuant to this section or Section 708.020 within 120 days after the judgment debtor has responded to the interrogatories or demands previously served pursuant to this section or Section 708.020, or within 120 days after the judgment debtor has been examined pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 708.110), and the judgment debtor is not required to respond to any discovery so served.

(c) Inspection demands served pursuant to this section may be enforced to the extent practicable, in the same manner as inspection demands in a civil action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 182, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 64 of Ch. 182.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Examination Proceedings [708.110. - 708.205.]

708.110.

(a) The judgment creditor may apply to the proper court for an order requiring the judgment debtor to appear before the court, or before a referee appointed by the court, at a time and place specified in the order, to furnish information to aid in enforcement of the money judgment.

(b) If the judgment creditor has not caused the judgment debtor to be examined under this section during the preceding 120 days, the court shall make the order upon ex parte application of the judgment creditor.

(c) If the judgment creditor has caused the judgment debtor to be examined under this section
 during the preceding 120 days, the court shall make the order if the judgment creditor by affidavit or otherwise shows good cause for the order. The application shall be made on noticed motion if the court so directs or a court rule so requires. Otherwise, it may be made ex parte.

(d) The judgment creditor shall personally serve a copy of the order on the judgment debtor not less than 30 days before the date set for the examination. Service shall be made in the manner specified in Section 415.10. Service of the order creates a lien on the personal property of the judgment debtor for a period of one year from the date of the order unless extended or sooner terminated by the court.

(e) Except
 as provided in section 708.111, the order shall contain the following statement in 14-point boldface type if printed or in capital letters if typed: “NOTICE TO JUDGMENT DEBTOR. If you fail to appear at the time and place specified in this order, you may be subject to arrest and punishment for contempt of court and the court may make an order requiring you to pay the reasonable attorney’s fees incurred by the judgment creditor in this proceeding.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 562, Sec. 1.   (AB 1119)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

708.111.

(a) This section applies to an application pursuant to Section 708.110 by a judgment creditor with a judgment concerning a consumer debt awarded on or after January 1, 2025.

(b) “Consumer debt” as used in this Section means any obligation or alleged obligation of a consumer to pay money arising out of a transaction in which the money, property, insurance, or services which are the subject of the transaction are primarily for personal, family, or household purposes. Consumer debt does not include debts incurred due to, or obtained by tortious or fraudulent conduct or judgments for unpaid wages, damages, or penalties owed to an employee. Consumer debt does not include rental debt, which means unpaid rent or other unpaid financial obligation
 of a tenant under the tenancy that has come due.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 708.110, if the order issued pursuant to section 708.110 requires a judgment debtor to appear in a case concerning consumer debt, as indicated by the judgment creditor in the application and order for appearance and examination, the order shall be accompanied by the Judicial Council form containing the list of exemptions from the enforcement judgments adopted pursuant to Section 681.030 and the notice of financial affidavit and financial affidavit forms adopted by the Judicial Council pursuant to subdivision (h). The order shall contain the following statement in 14-point boldface type if printed or in capital letters if typed: “NOTICE TO JUDGMENT DEBTOR. If you fail to appear at the time and place specified in this order, the court may make an order requiring you to pay the reasonable attorney’s fees and costs incurred by the judgment creditor in
 this proceeding. Instead of appearing at the examination, you may file a notice of judgment debtor’s financial affidavit in a form prescribed by the court and signed under penalty of perjury and serve copies of all filed documents and the financial affidavit on the judgment creditor no later than 15 days prior to the date set for the examination.”

(d) If the judgment debtor in a case concerning consumer debt states in a financial affidavit, signed under penalty of perjury, that all of their income and assets are exempt, and files with the court a notice of financial affidavit with a proof of service, the court shall cancel the examination and provide notice of cancellation to the parties. If copies of the financial affidavit are not timely served or the notice and proof of service are not timely filed with the court, the court shall not cancel the examination. 

(1) Within 15 days
 after the filing of the notice and proof of service of the financial affidavit, a judgment creditor who objects to the affidavit shall file with the court a notice of motion for an order determining the need for the debtor to appear for a debtor’s examination. If the notice of motion is not timely filed with the court, the debtor’s examination shall remain canceled.

(2) The notice of motion for an order determining the need for a debtor to appear for a debtor’s examination shall include a declaration executed under oath and include a statement of facts showing good cause why a debtor’s examination is necessary notwithstanding the debtor’s financial affidavit. In an action in which the consumer debt is secured by real property or personal property, a showing of good cause is established when the plaintiff demonstrates that the debtor has not provided the plaintiff with accurate information regarding the location or condition of the security, the
 status of insurance on the security, or the status of the taxes due on the security.

(3) The judgment creditor shall file and serve the motion described in paragraph (1) pursuant to Section 1005 and the hearing shall be held pursuant to the same section.

(4) The financial affidavit and motion for an order determining the need for a debtor to appear for a debtor’s examination, as well as any pleading filed in support of the motion and any reply by the judgment debtor, shall constitute the pleadings, subject to the power of the court to permit amendments in the interest of justice.

(5) If no other evidence is offered, the court, if satisfied that sufficient facts are shown by the financial affidavit and the notice of motion, may make its determination thereon. If not satisfied, the court shall order the hearing
 continued for the production of other oral or documentary evidence.

(6) At the conclusion of the hearing, the court shall determine by order whether the judgment debtor shall appear for a debtor’s examination. If the judgment debtor is ordered to appear, the judgment creditor shall schedule the time and place of the examination with the court. There shall be no filing fee for the judgment creditor to refile the application and order for appearance and examination for the rescheduled exam. The judgment creditor is not required to serve the application and order by personal service, but may serve them by mail or electronic service at least 30 days before the date set for examination, pursuant to Sections 1013 and 1010.6.

(7) If the examination is canceled because the judgment creditor does not object or for another reason, the judgment creditor shall not file another application and
 order for appearance and examination until one year from the date of the prior filed application and order for appearance and examination.

(e) The financial affidavit shall include the following information:

(1) The number of people relying on the judgment debtor for support, including spouse, dependents, and other household members.

(2) Gross monthly income from employment, including withholdings and take home pay.

(3) Total monthly income from all sources other than employment.

(4) Property owned, including cash, bank accounts, real estate equity, vehicles (e.g., cars, motorcycles, and boats), jewelry, securities, certificates of deposit, entity ownership, life insurance policies, and
 tax refunds.

(5) Itemized monthly expenses.

(6) Any outstanding debts, including balance owed and to whom.

(7) Any other facts which support the claim of exemption.

(f) In a case concerning consumer debt in which the judgment debtor claims property is exempt pursuant to law exempting property to the extent necessary for the support of the judgment debtor and the spouse and dependents of the judgment debtor, the financial affidavit shall also include the following information. The financial affidavit shall also be signed under penalty of perjury by the spouse of the judgment debtor, unless the spouses are living separate and apart.

(1) The name of the spouse of the judgment debtor.

(2) The age and relationship of all persons dependent upon the judgment debtor or the spouse of the judgment debtor for support.

(3) All sources and the amounts of earnings and other income of the spouse and dependents of the judgment debtor.

(4) A list of the assets of the spouse and dependents of the judgment debtor and the value of such assets.

(5) All outstanding debts of the spouse and dependents of the judgment debtor.

(g) A judgment debtor in a case concerning consumer debt who elects to file a financial affidavit in lieu of appearing before the court for an examination shall serve a copy of all filed documents on the judgment creditor no later than 15 days prior to the date set for
 the examination.

(h) The Judicial Council shall adopt a notice of financial affidavit form and a financial affidavit form and revise any existing forms as necessary to implement the requirements of this section.

(i) Notwithstanding Section 708.170, 1209, or 1993, or any other applicable law or court rule, for a case involving consumer debt:

(1) No warrant for arrest or to appear shall be issued for a judgment debtor in a case concerning consumer debt who fails to appear for an examination under this section or to file and serve the judgment debtor’s financial affidavit. In such cases, the court shall issue an order to show cause to determine whether to issue a warrant to compel the attendance of the judgment debtor.

(2) The court shall provide a
 judgment debtor who is ordered to appear pursuant to an order to show cause described in paragraph (1) with a reasonable opportunity to complete and file a judgment debtor’s financial affidavit described in subdivision (e). The warrant to compel the attendance of the judgment debtor shall be satisfied by the judgment debtor’s appearance or the filing of a notice of financial affidavit and proof of service pursuant to subdivision (d) certifying that the notice and financial affidavit was served on the judgment creditor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 562, Sec. 2.   (AB 1119)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

708.120.

(a) Upon ex parte application by a judgment creditor who has a money judgment and proof by the judgment creditor by affidavit or otherwise to the satisfaction of the proper court that a third person has possession or control of property in which the judgment debtor has an interest or is indebted to the judgment debtor in an amount exceeding two hundred fifty dollars ($250), the court shall make an order directing the third person to appear before the court, or before a referee appointed by the court, at a time and place specified
 in the order, to answer concerning such property or debt. The affidavit in support of the judgment creditor’s application may be based on the affiant’s information and belief.

(b) Not less than 10 days prior to the date set for the examination, a copy of the order shall be:

(1) Served personally on the third person.

(2) Served personally or by mail on the judgment debtor.

(c) If the property in the third person’s possession or control in which the judgment debtor has an interest or the debt owed by the third person to the judgment debtor is described in the affidavit or application for an order under subdivision (a) in a manner reasonably adequate to permit it to be identified, service of the order on the third person creates a lien on the judgment
 debtor’s interest in the property or on the debt for a period of one year from the date of the order unless extended or sooner terminated by the court.

(d) The judgment debtor may claim that all or any portion of the property or debt is exempt from enforcement of a money judgment by application to the court on noticed motion, filed with the court and personally served on the judgment creditor not later than three days before the date set for the examination. The judgment debtor shall execute an affidavit in support of the application that includes all of the matters set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 703.520. If a claim of exemption is made pursuant to this section, a notice of opposition to the claim of exemption is not required. The court shall determine any claim of exemption made pursuant to this section. Failure of the judgment debtor to make a claim of exemption does not preclude the judgment debtor from later claiming the exemption
 unless the property or debt is described in the order in a manner reasonably adequate to permit it to be identified and the judgment debtor receives notice of the examination proceeding at least 10 days before the date set for the examination.

(e) An order made pursuant to subdivision (a) shall contain the following statements in 14-point boldface type if printed or in capital letters if typed:

(1) “NOTICE TO PERSON SERVED. If you fail to appear at the time and place specified in this order, you may be subject to arrest and punishment for contempt of court and the court may make an order requiring you to pay the reasonable attorney’s fees incurred by the judgment creditor in this proceeding.”

(2) “NOTICE TO JUDGMENT DEBTOR. The person in whose favor the judgment was entered in this action claims that the person to be
 examined pursuant to this order has possession or control of property which is yours or owes you a debt. This property or debt is as follows: (Description of property or debt). 
If you claim that all or any portion of this property or debt is exempt from enforcement of the money judgment, you must file your exemption claim in writing with the court and personally serve a copy on the judgment creditor not later than three days before the date set for the examination. You must appear at the time and place set for this examination to establish your claim of exemption or your exemption may be waived.”

(f) An order made pursuant to subdivision (a) is not effective unless, at the time it is served on the third person, the person serving the order tenders to the third person fees for the mileage necessary to be traveled from the third person’s residence to the place of examination. The mileage fees shall be in the same amount generally provided
 for witnesses when legally required to attend civil proceedings in the court where the examination proceeding is to be conducted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 576, Sec. 3.6.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

708.130.

(a) Witnesses may be required to appear and testify before the court or referee in an examination proceeding under this article in the same manner as upon the trial of an issue.

(b) The privilege prescribed by Article 4 (commencing with Section 970) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code does not apply in an examination proceeding under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

708.140.

(a) The examination proceedings authorized by this article may be conducted by a referee appointed by the court. The referee may issue, modify, or vacate an order authorized by Section 708.205, may make a protective order authorized by Section 708.200, and may issue a warrant authorized by Section 708.170, and has the same power as the court to grant adjournments, to preserve order, and to subpoena witnesses to attend the examination, but only the court that ordered the reference has power to do the following:

(1) Punish for contempt
 for disobeying an order of the referee.

(2) Make an award of attorney’s fees pursuant to Section 708.170.

(3) Determine a contested claim of exemption or determine a third-party claim under Section 708.180.

(b) Only a member of the State Bar of California is eligible for appointment as a referee pursuant to this article. A person who was duly appointed as a referee prior to July 1, 1983, pursuant to the law in operation at the time of appointment, and who is available to perform the duties of a referee on July 1, 1983, shall be exempt from the requirements of this subdivision.

(c) Nothing in subdivision (a) limits the power of a court to appoint a temporary judge pursuant to Section 21 of Article VI of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 155, Sec. 19.   Effective June 30, 1983.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

708.150.

(a) (1) If a corporation, partnership, association, trust, limited liability company, or other organization is served with an order to appear for an examination, it shall designate to appear and be examined one or more officers, directors, managing agents, or other persons who are familiar with its property and debts.
